Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 1 Causes of Action
9-1-30.
Demand for judgment in an action alleging personal injury, injury to property, or wrongful death — Exclusion of monetary amount.

No complaint or pleading in an action of contract or tort for personal injury, injury to property, or wrongful death shall contain an ad damnum or monetary amount claimed against any defendant or defendants; provided, however, that in any action brought before the superior court, the complaint shall state that the monetary amount claimed is sufficient to establish the jurisdiction of the superior court.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a complaint or pleading in an action of contract or tort for personal injury, injury to property, or wrongful death in any action brought before the district court shall state the monetary amount claimed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 244, § 8; P.L. 1977, ch. 77, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 149, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 522, § 7; P.L. 1988, ch. 393, § 1.

9-1-31.
Public school teachers, supervisors, and administrators — Immunity from liability — Compensation for certain injuries — Duty upon school committees and board of regents.

Each school committee and the board of regents shall protect and save harmless

any public school teacher

any supervisor, administrator, or licensed professional employee

any employee whose position requires a certificate from the department of education or board of regents for elementary and secondary education

any employee whose position directly involves work with students

any employee of the board of regents

from financial loss and expense, including legal fees and costs, if any, arising out of any claim, demand, or suit for actions resulting in accidental bodily injury to or death of any person, or in accidental damage to or destruction of property, within or without the school building, or any other acts, including but not limited to infringement of any person’s civil rights, resulting in any injury, which acts are not wanton, reckless, malicious, or grossly negligent, as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, provided the teacher, supervisor, or administrator, at the time of the acts resulting in the injury, death, damages, or destruction, was acting in the discharge of his or her duties or within the scope of his or her employment or under the direction of the school committee or the board of regents.

For the purpose of this section, the term “teacher” shall include any student teacher doing practice teaching under the direction of a teacher employed by a school committee or the board of regents.

Each school committee and the board of regents shall protect and save harmless any teacher or any supervisor or administrator from financial loss and expense, including payment of expenses reasonably incurred for medical or other service, necessary as a result of an assault upon the teacher, supervisor, or administrator while the person was acting in the discharge of his or her duties within the scope of his or her employment or under the direction of the school committee or the board of regents, which expenses are not paid by the individual teacher’s, supervisor’s, or administrator’s workers’ compensation.

Any teacher, supervisor, or administrator absent from his or her employment as a result of injury sustained during an assault upon the teacher, supervisor, or administrator that occurred while the teacher, supervisor, or administrator was discharging his or her duties within the scope of his or her employment or under the direction of the school committee or the board of regents, or for a court appearance in connection with the assault, shall continue to receive his or her full salary, while so absent, except that the amount of any workers’ compensation award may be deducted from his or her salary payments during the absence. The time of the absence shall not be charged against the teacher’s, supervisor’s, or administrator’s sick leave, vacation time, or personal leave days.

A person so injured in accordance with subdivision (d) above and who receives a disability therefrom, which renders them unable to fully perform their normal duties, shall, if the disability continues for a period of one year, apply to the Rhode Island employees retirement system for appropriate benefits for which that person is entitled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 212, § 1.

9-1-31.1.
Members of public bodies — Exemption from liability.

Definitions. The following words and terms shall have the following respective meanings, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Public body” means any branch, department, division, agency, commission, committee, board, council, bureau, authority, or any subdivision thereof of state government or any other public agency or public body corporate of the state of Rhode Island or any political subdivision thereof.

“Qualified member” means an individual who serves without monetary or other compensation as a member of a public body for the purpose of setting policy, controlling, or otherwise overseeing the activities or functional responsibilities of the public body. As used in this section, “compensation” does not include a per diem or per meeting allowance, health insurance benefits, or reimbursement for out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred in the service.

Limitation of liability. Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified member of a public body shall not be held civilly liable for any breach of his or her duties as such member, provided that nothing herein contained shall eliminate or limit the liability of a qualified member:

For acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

For any transaction from which such member derived an improper personal benefit; or

For any malicious, willful or wanton act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 522, § 5.

9-1-32.
Effect of alteration of product after sale.

As used in this section:

“Person injured” means the person who sustained damages because of personal injury, death, or property damage.

“Product liability damages” means damages because of personal injury, death, or property damage sustained by reason of an alleged defect in a product, or an alleged failure to warn or protect against a danger or hazard in the use or misuse of the product, or an alleged failure to instruct properly in the use of a product.

“Subsequent alteration or modification” means an alteration or modification of a product made subsequent to the manufacture or sale by the manufacturer or seller that altered, modified, or changed the purpose, use, function, design, or manner of use of the product from that originally designed, tested, or intended by the manufacturer, or the purpose, use, function, design, or manner of use or intended use for which the product was originally designed, tested, or manufactured.

Any defense claimed by the manufacturer or seller that the person injured made a subsequent alteration or modification to the product that is found to be a significant contributing factor to the injury, death, or property damage shall be controlled by the comparative negligence provisions of §

9-20-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 387, § 1, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 388, § 1, effective July 13, 2021.

9-1-33.
Insurer’s bad faith refusal to pay a claim made under any insurance policy.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an insured under any insurance policy as set out in the general laws or otherwise may bring an action against the insurer issuing the policy when it is alleged the insurer wrongfully and in bad faith refused to pay or settle a claim made pursuant to the provisions of the policy, or otherwise wrongfully and in bad faith refused to timely perform its obligations under the contract of insurance. In any action brought pursuant to this section, an insured may also make claim for compensatory damages, punitive damages, and reasonable attorney fees. In all cases in which there has been no trial in the superior court on or before May 20, 1981, the question of whether or not an insurer has acted in bad faith in refusing to settle a claim shall be a question to be determined by the trier of fact.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all actions against insurers which have been commenced and are pending in any state or federal court on May 20, 1981.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 235, § 1.

9-1-34.
Administering cardiopulmonary resuscitation or automated external defibrillation — Immunity from liability.

No person, whether acting in an official capacity or as a private volunteer, who gratuitously renders emergency assistance in the nature of cardiopulmonary resuscitation or automated external defibrillation to a person in need thereof, shall be liable for civil damages for any personal injuries which result from acts or omissions by such persons rendering the emergency care, which may constitute ordinary negligence; provided, however, that this immunity applies only to persons who have been trained in accordance with standards promulgated by either the American heart association or the American national red cross. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross, willful, or wanton negligence. This immunity shall also extend to persons providing approved training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and use of automated external defibrillation in accordance with standards promulgated by either the American heart association or the American national red cross and to physicians providing medical direction oversight for programs of automated external defibrillator use.

Property lessees and owners where the emergency assistance occurs as well as the owners of the actual life saving equipment shall enjoy immunity from liability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 290, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 208, § 1.

9-1-35.
Civil action for ethnic or religious intimidation and/or vandalism.

Any person, who is maliciously subjected to an act or acts which would reasonably be construed as intended to harass or intimidate the person because of his or her race, religion, or national origin, may bring an action in the superior court against the perpetrator of the act or acts for compensatory damages including damages for emotional distress. The court, in its discretion, may also restrain and enjoin such future acts by the defendant.

If any provision or part of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions or parts of this section are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 373, § 2.

9-1-36.
Enumeration of statutes of limitation.

The following compilation of statutes of limitation for civil actions is set forth as an aid to the public and is not intended to replace the specific statutes referred to herein. The omission of any statute of limitation from this list shall in no way affect the validity of that statute.

Section Civil Action Period of Limitation

6-27-7

Enforcement of penalty provisions of the Rhode Island Truth-in-Lending and Retail Selling Act 1 year

6-36-23

Enforcement of Antitrust Act 4 years

6A-2-725(1)

Breach of contracts for sale of goods 4 years

6A-2-725(5)

Breach of warranty in products liability actions 10 years

9-1-5

Liability of landlord for tenant improvements, oral lease of more than one year 1 year after original term

9-1-13(a)

All civil actions not otherwise limited 10 years

9-1-13(b)

Product liability actions 10 years from purchase

9-1-14

For words spoken 1 year

9-1-14

Injuries to the person, generally 3 years

9-1-14.1

Medical, veterinarian, accounting, insurance, or real estate agent or broker malpractice 3 years

9-1-14.2

"Agent Orange" or phenoxy herbicides actions 3 years

9-1-14.3

Legal malpractice 3 years

9-1-17

Contracts or liabilities under seal; judgment; decrees 20 years

9-1-25

Suit against state, city or town or by special act 3 years

9-1-29

Against contractors, architects or engineers based on design 10 years after substantial completion

9-1-41

Loss of consortium – Loss of society and companionship 3 years

9-3-6

To enforce hospital liens 1 year from payment

9-3-11

Against insurer to enforce repairer's lien 1 year from payment to insured

9-3-14

Against insurer to enforce motor vehicle lessor's lien 1 year from payment to insured

10-6-4

For contributions from joint tortfeasors 1 year after payment by other joint tortfeasor

10-7-2

Wrongful death; loss of consortium, companionship or society in wrongful death action 3 years

10-7-7

Pain and suffering in wrongful death action 3 years

10-7.1-2

Libel of deceased person 1 year after death if libel occurred within 3 months after death

10-12-10

Jail yard bond 1 year

15-8-4

To enforce support obligations of putative father 6 years

15-8-6

To determine paternity 4 years after birth

24-8-35

Damages caused by pothole in state road; $300 limit 7 days

27-5-3

Claims against insurers on fire insurance policies 24 months

27-18-3

Claims against insurers on accident and sickness insurance policies 3 years

28-5-18

Complaint by human rights commission to eliminate unlawful employment practice 1 year

28-35-57

Workers' Compensation claim 2 years

31-5.1-15

Involving the regulation of business practices among motor vehicle manufacturers, distributors and dealers 4 years

33-6-14

Against executor to recover annuity or interest given life tenant by will 1 year

33-11-50

By creditor of decedent, other than on fiduciary's bond 2 years

33-13-9

To recover legacies or to impress and preserve a lien or charge on real estate 6 years

33-13-15

Against liens by creditor with contingent claim not accruing within six (6) months of fiduciary's qualification 1 year from accrual

33-13-15

Against lien by creditor who from accident, mistake or other cause failed to file within six (6) months of qualification 3 years from publication

33-21.1-26

Judicial review of decision of general treasurer (or his or her failure to act) concerning unclaimed property 90 days after decision; 180 days after filing if no decision

34-4-24

Proceedings based upon right of entry for condition broken or possibility of reverter to which a fee simple or fee simple determinable in land is subject, created before May 11, 1953 No later than December 31, 1987

34-19-10

Alleging forcible entry and detainer of land 3 years

34-28-10

To enforce mechanic's lien; notice given 1 year and 120 days

34-28-10

To enforce mechanic's lien; no notice given 120 days

37-6-18

For assessment of damages in state condemnation proceedings 1 year

37-12-5

For labor, material, or equipment against contractor's bond 2 years (or longer if so provided in bond)

37-13.1-1

Against state on highway and public works contracts 1 year

37-16-17

To confirm arbitrator's award in public works arbitration 1 year

39-2-7

Against public utilities for violations under chapters 1 – 5 of title 39 3 years

39-12-28

By owners or holders of receipts or bills of lading against intrastate common carriers 2 years

44-5-26

For relief from local tax assessments 3 months from last day to pay without penalty

45-15-9

Against towns for injury or damage arising out of maintenance of highways, causeways or bridges 3 years (with 60 days’ notice after incident)

45-20-1

Judicial review of decision of bureau of police or fire or similar department for removing petitioner 30 days

45-29-7

For assessment of damages in housing authority condemnation proceeding; with notice 3 months

45-29-7

For assessment of damages in housing authority condemnation proceeding; no notice 1 year

45-32-34

For assessment of damages in redevelopment project condemnation proceeding; with notice 3 months

45-32-34

For assessment of damages in redevelopment project condemnation proceeding; no notice 1 year

46-5-6

For assessment of damages in department of environmental management condem-nation proceeding; with notice 6 months

46-5-6

For assessment of damages in department of environmental management condem-nation proceeding; no notice 1 year

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 388, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 5.

9-1-37.
Enumeration of periods of appeal.

The following compilation of periods of appeal for criminal and civil actions is set forth as an aid to the public, and is not intended to replace the specific statutes referred to herein. The omission of any statute from this list shall in no way affect the validity of the omitted statute.

Section Action Period of Appeal

1-3-27

From board of appeals for airport zoning, to superior court 20 days

2-18-12

Orders of chief entomologist, to director of environmental management 5 days

3-7-21

Denial of class A, B, or C liquor license, to state liquor control administrator 10 days

3-12-11

Forfeiture of alcoholic beverages, from district to superior court 5 days

3-12-20

Conviction of possessing or selling unlawful alcoholic beverages, from district to superior court 5 days

4-1-14

Forfeiture of fighting birds or animals, from district to superior court 5 days

4-14-16

Replevin of impounded animals, from district to superior court 2 days

9-9-24

Decisions of jury commissioner, to superior court 1 year

9-12-10

Civil actions generally, from district to superior court 2 days

9-21-6

Orders of district or probate courts, or town council, where appeal not timely filed from accident, mistake or neglect, to superior court 90 days

9-24-7

Interlocutory orders, such as denial of injunction, appointment of receiver, or new trial motions, from superior to supreme court 20 days

9-24-32

Right of state to appeal in criminal and family court cases, to supreme court (where defendant not in jeopardy) 20 days

10-3-19

Judgments based on award of court appointed arbitrators, from superior to supreme court 20 days

10-4-12

From proceedings involving assignment for benefit of creditors, from superior to supreme court 30 days

10-9.1-9

Post-conviction judgments, from district to superior court, or from superior to supreme court 20 days

12-5.1-6

Denial of request for approval of interception of wire or oral communications, by state, from superior to supreme court 20 days

12-5.1-12

Granting of motion to suppress contents of intercepted wire or oral communications, or evidence obtained therefrom, by state, from superior to supreme court 30 days

12-22-1

Criminal cases generally, from district to superior court 5 days

12-22-1

.1 Fines in criminal cases, from district to supreme court 20 days by certiorari

12-27-11

Cases involving adjudication of obscene publications, from superior to supreme court 20 days

14-1-52

Family court cases, generally, from family to supreme court 20 days

15-8-24

Paternity or bastardy cases, from family to supreme court 30 days

16-12.1-6

Orders of school committees affecting rights of public school administrators, to commissioner of elementary and secondary education 10 days

23-1-24

Compliance orders by director of health department, from superior or supreme court 30 days

23-23.5-3

City or town council orders prohibiting noxious trades, to superior court 3 days .5

23-27.3-127.2

Orders of building inspectors to local boards of appeal under BOCA Code 30 days

23-28.5-6

Orders of fire officials under state fire code, to superior court 30 days

24-7-5

Orders of city or town council laying sidewalk assessments, to superior court 40 days

28-35-28

Workers' compensation cases, from trial judge to appellate commission 5 days

28-35-29

Workers' compensation cases, to supreme court 20 days

33-9-21

Orders of superior court approving investment powers of guardians and conservators, to supreme court 10 days

33-15-40

Orders of superior court regarding powers of guardians or conservators to support dependents of ward 20 days

33-23-1

Probate cases generally, from probate to superior court 20 days

33-23-1

Probate cases generally, from superior to supreme court 30 days

39-5-1

Decisions of public utilities commission, to supreme court 7 days by certiorari

45-5-16

City and town council matters generally, to superior court 40 days

45-20-1

Bureau of fire and police, by firefighter, to superior court 30 days 45-23-20 Boards of review for subdivision control, or plan commissioner, to superior court 20 days

45-23.1-5

Town council decisions regarding mapped streets, to supreme court 30 days

45-24-69

Zoning board cases generally, to superior court 20 days

45-24.2-6

Housing boards of review cases, to district court 30 days

46-20-4

Town council decisions regarding power to drain water across land of abutting owners 40 days

42-35-15

Orders of all administrative agencies of state government not specifically exempted by of the Administrative Procedures Act §

42-35-18

30 days

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 388, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 14.

9-1-38.
Limitation of actions for medical expenses incurred by minors.

Actions for medical expenses incurred by a minor, whether the minor or the minor’s parents or guardian has expended the sums, which medical expenses were incurred as the result of the negligence of a third party, shall be commenced and sued upon within three (3) years next after the minor reaches the age of eighteen (18) years, and not after. This section shall be given retroactive as well as prospective effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 388, § 27.

9-1-39.
Civil action for desecration.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any person, organization, corporation, or association which is the owner of property that is injured, destroyed, written upon, painted, or otherwise damaged or defaced in violation of §

11-44-31

may bring an action for compensatory damages against the person or persons committing the offense described in §

11-44-31

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 374, § 2.

9-1-40.
Civil liability for nonpayment of accident and sickness insurance by employer.

Whenever any person suffers any injury or loss to his or her person or property as a result of the intentional failure of his or her employer to pay any health insurance premium to which the person contributes through his or her employer, the person may recover his or her damages for any injury in a civil action against the employer. The employer shall be liable to the employee for twice the amount of expenses including but not limited to all medical and legal expenses incurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 156, § 1.

9-1-41.
Loss of consortium — Loss of society and companionship.

A married person is entitled to recover damages for loss of consortium caused by tortious injury to his or her spouse.

An unemancipated minor is entitled to recover damages for the loss of parental society and companionship caused by tortious injury to his or her parent.

Parents are entitled to recover damages for the loss of their unemancipated minor child’s society and companionship caused by tortious injury to the minor.

Actions under this section shall be brought within the time limited under §

9-1-14

or

9-1-14.1

, whichever is applicable, for actions for injuries to the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 544, § 1.

9-1-42.
Alienation of affection, criminal conversation, or seduction — Causes of action abolished.

No civil action shall be commenced or prosecuted for alienation of affection, criminal conversation, or seduction, and those causes of action are hereby abolished.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 123, § 2.

9-1-43.
Civil action for childsnatching.

Any person, including a parent, who intentionally removes, causes the removal of, or detains any child under the age of eighteen (18) years with intent to deny another person’s right of custody under an existing decree or order of the family court in violation of §

11-26-1.1

shall be liable in an action at law, suit in equity, or any other appropriate proceeding for redress in the superior court. Actions brought pursuant to this section may include, but not limited to, damages for mental and emotional distress, loss of service, society and companionship, compensatory damages incurred in searching for the missing child, punitive damages, injunctive relief, and attorney’s fees.

If any provision or part of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions or parts of this section are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 166, § 1.

9-1-44.
Civil action for release of names of minors.

No member of any municipal or state agency shall release the identity of any minor who is believed to be a victim of a violation of any law except with the consent of his or her parent or guardian. This section shall not prevent the release of the identity of minors involved in a violation of a motor vehicle law or involved in a motor vehicle accident.

Any person found to be in violation of the provisions of this section shall be liable to the minor in a civil action brought on behalf of the minor for compensatory damages and court costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 384, § 1.

9-1-45.
Attorney’s fees in breach of contract actions.

The court may award a reasonable attorney’s fee to the prevailing party in any civil action arising from a breach of contract in which the court:

Finds that there was a complete absence of a justiciable issue of either law or fact raised by the losing party; or

Renders a default judgment against the losing party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 371, § 2.

9-1-46.
Affirmative defense of trespasser’s intent to commit a crime.

The owner or person legally entitled to possession of any land or building shall be entitled to plead as an affirmative defense that the injured person was trespassing with the intent to commit a felony, which upon proof thereof shall prohibit the trespasser from recovering for personal injuries sustained while upon the land or building, unless those injuries were inflicted by unreasonable force by the owner or person legally entitled to possession of the land or building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 473, § 1.

9-1-47.
Loss of homemaker services.

In any suit for damages as a result of personal injuries, a homemaker may recover the fair value of homemaker services provided to the home and those living therein. A “homemaker” as used herein is a person who has primary responsibility for the care of a home and a family and who receives no direct monetary compensation for those duties. The fair value of homemaker services shall not be limited to money actually expended to replace the services usually provided by the homemaker. In such a suit, the value of the homemaker services may be shown by expert testimony, but such testimony is not required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 81, § 1.

9-1-48.
Immunity from civil liability — Sports teams.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, no person who, without compensation and as a volunteer, renders services as a manager, coach, instructor, umpire, referee, or official or who, without compensation and as a volunteer, assists a manager, coach, instructor, umpire, referee, or official in a youth sports program organized and conducted by or under the auspices of a nonprofit corporation, and no director, trustee, officer, or employee of a nonprofit corporation which organizes, conducts, or sponsors a youth sports program, shall be liable to any person for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions in the rendering of such services or assistance or in the organization, conduct, or sponsorship of the youth sports program unless the acts or omissions of the person were committed in willful, wanton, or reckless disregard for the safety of the participants in the youth sports program. It shall be insufficient to impose liability upon any such person to establish only that the conduct of the person fell below ordinary standards of care.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, no person who renders services as a manager, coach, instructor, umpire, referee, or official or who assists a manager, coach, instructor, umpire, referee, or official in an interscholastic or intramural sports program organized and conducted in accordance with and subject to the rules, regulations, and jurisdiction of the Rhode Island interscholastic league, the committee on junior high school athletics, and/or the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall be liable to any person for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions in the rendering of such services or assistance unless the acts or omissions of the person were committed in willful, wanton, or reckless disregard for the safety of the participants in the interscholastic or intramural sports program.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to grant immunity to any person, corporation, or other entity who or which causes injury or damage as the result of the negligent operation of a motor vehicle.

For purposes of this section:

“Compensation” shall not include reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred or to be incurred or, solely in the case of umpires, referees, or other game officials, a modest honorarium.

“Nonprofit corporation” shall include any nonprofit corporation or nonprofit association organized under the law of this state, or of any other state, or of the United States, which is authorized to do business in this state.

“Youth sports program” shall include any program organized for recreational athletic competition, and/or instruction and whose participants are nineteen (19) years of age or younger or physically or mentally disabled regardless of age.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 7; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 7; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 16.

9-1-49.
Correct corporate name and registered agent — Duty to provide.

Whenever any person notifies a corporation that it intends to commence a civil action against the corporation, it shall be the duty of the corporation to inform the person of its correct corporate name, its state of incorporation, its business address as designated in its state of incorporation, its registered agent and the address of its registered agent within fourteen (14) days of receipt of the notification. If the corporation is aware that a subsidiary or affiliate is a proper party to the civil action, the corporation shall also provide the correct name and address of the subsidiary or affiliate.

Whenever a corporation is served with a complaint it shall notify the plaintiff within twenty (20) days of service of its correct corporate name, its state of incorporation, its business address as designated in its state of incorporation, its registered agent, and the address of its registered agent, and if the corporation is aware that a subsidiary or affiliate is a proper party to the civil action, the corporation shall also provide the correct name and address of the subsidiary or affiliate. Failure of the corporation to so notify the plaintiff shall result in a defense on these issues being waived by the corporation, and the corporation shall be estopped from asserting that the complaint failed to identify the corporation by its correct corporate name, or that the corporation is not a proper party to the civil action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 66, § 1.

9-1-50.
Settled claims not paid within thirty (30) days.

Whenever any claim is settled, the insurance company, adjusting company, or any other person, firm, or corporation responsible for paying the settlement shall make payment within thirty (30) days from the date the claimant or his or her attorney sends the release. Failure to make payment within thirty (30) days shall raise a presumption that failure to do so was a willful and wanton disregard for the rights of the claimant. In addition to all other remedies, the payor shall be liable to the claimant in a separate cause of action for punitive damages and interest which shall be computed at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum from the date the cause of action giving rise to the settlement occurred until the judgment on the claim brought pursuant to this section is entered.

Any claim brought under the provisions of this section shall be given a priority on the trial calendar.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 341, § 1.

9-1-51.
Limitation on actions based on sexual abuse or exploitation of a child.

All claims or causes of action brought against a perpetrator defendant by any person for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a result of sexual abuse shall be commenced within the later to expire of:

Thirty-five (35) years of the act alleged to have caused the injury or condition; or

Seven (7) years from the time the victim discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the injury or condition was caused by the act.

Provided, however, that the time limit or commencement of such an action under this section shall be tolled for a child until the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age. For the purposes of this section, “sexual abuse” shall have the same meaning as in subsection (e) of this section.

All claims or causes of action brought against a non-perpetrator defendant by any person alleging negligent supervision of a person that sexually abused a minor, or that the non-perpetrator defendant’s conduct caused or contributed to the childhood sexual abuse by another person to include, but not be limited to, wrongful conduct, neglect or default in supervision, hiring, employment, training, monitoring, or failure to report and/or the concealment of sexual abuse of a child shall be commenced within the later to expire of:

Thirty-five (35) years of the act or acts alleged to have caused an injury or condition to the minor; or

Seven (7) years from the time the victim discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the injury or condition was caused by the act.

Provided, however, that the time limit or commencement of such an action under this section shall be tolled for a child until the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age.

For purposes of this section “sexual abuse” shall have the same meaning as in subsection (e) of this section.

As to a perpetrator defendant, any claim or cause of action based on conduct of sexual abuse may be commenced within the time period enumerated in subsections (a)(1)(i) and (a)(1)(ii) regardless if the claim was time-barred under previous version of the general laws.

Except as provided in subsection (a)(3) herein, any claim or cause of action based on conduct of sexual abuse or conduct that caused or contributed to sexual abuse, if the action is not otherwise time-barred under previous version of the general laws on the effective date of this section, may be commenced within the time period enumerated in subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section.

The victim need not establish which act in a series of continuing sexual abuse or exploitation incidents caused the injury complained of, but may compute the date of discovery from the date of the last act by the same perpetrator which is part of a common scheme or plan of sexual abuse or exploitation.

The knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall not be imputed to a person under the age of eighteen (18) years.

For purposes of this section, “child” means a person under the age of eighteen (18) years.

As used in this section, “sexual abuse” means any act committed by the defendant against a complainant who was less than eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the act and which act would have been a criminal violation of chapter 37 of title 11.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 3.

9-1-52.
Cause of action for next lowest bidding qualified contractor.

Whenever a contractor or subcontractor, having been awarded the contract as the lowest qualified bidder, violates the state’s prevailing wage, a cause of action shall be for the next lowest qualified bidder for any and all damages incurred as the result of not being awarded the contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 429, § 1.

9-1-53.
Misclassification of employees — Civil action.

Any person, firm, or corporation which suffers damages as a result of a competitive bid for a contract not being accepted due to another person, firm, or corporation knowingly misclassifying employees as independent subcontractors may bring an action for damages in the appropriate district or superior court. For the purposes of an action brought pursuant to this section, employee status shall be determined by the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding Internal Revenue Code of the United States, as from time to time amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 505, § 1.

9-1-54.
Civil action against employer by employee under subpoena.

An employer shall not discharge, threaten, or otherwise take any adverse action against an employee regarding the employee’s compensation, terms, conditions, location, or privileges of employment:

When an employee has been duly served with a subpoena, to give evidence or testify before any court, within or without the state of Rhode Island, or before any judicial, quasi-judicial, or other administrative body or entity with the authority to issue subpoenas.

When the employee, upon being duly served with a properly issued subpoena, promptly provides notice to their employer of being served and of the requirement to attend court or other duly constituted hearing.

Any employer who violates this section may be liable for damages which may include actual damages, compensatory damages, and reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred by the employee.

Any cause of action under this section shall be commenced within three (3) years from the date of violation.

Nothing herein shall prevent an aggrieved employee from pursuing any other cause of action under federal or state law.

Nothing herein shall require an employer to compensate an employee for time missed from work for complying with a subpoena.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 51, § 1.